District of Columbia statutes.
2-828

Property under jurisdiction of Congress.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be applicable to the United States Capitol buildings or grounds or other properties under the jurisdiction of the Congress or any committee, commission, or officer thereof: Provided, however, that any of the services or facilities authorized by or under this chapter shall be made available with respect to any such properties upon request or approval of the joint committee of the Senate and House of Representatives appointed by the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives to make the necessary arrangements for the inauguration of the President-elect and the Vice President-elect.

History

Aug. 6, 1956, 70 Stat. 1051, ch. 974, § 9

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1808.
1973 Ed., § 1-1209.